Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF346.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2666XS (1) 91 je/js S.F. 346 Section 1. Section 8A.415, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. An employee, except an employee covered by a collective 3 bargaining agreement which provides otherwise, who has 4 exhausted the available agency steps in the uniform grievance 5 procedure provided for in the department rules may, within 6 seven calendar days following the date a decision was 7 received or should have been received at the second step of 8 the grievance procedure, file the grievance at the third 9 step with the director. The director shall respond within 10 thirty calendar days following receipt of the third step 11 grievance. The director shall include in the response a 12 description of each interview carried out by the department 13 relating to the grievance, the results of such interviews, and 14 the justification for the directorâs decision regarding the 15 grievance. 16 Sec. 2. Section 8A.415, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 17 2025, is amended to read as follows: 18 a. A merit system employee, except an employee covered by a 19 collective bargaining agreement, who is discharged, suspended, 20 demoted, or otherwise receives a reduction in pay, except 21 during the employeeâs probationary period, may bypass steps one 22 and two of the grievance procedure and appeal the disciplinary 23 action to the director within seven calendar days following 24 the effective date of the action. The director shall respond 25 within thirty calendar days following receipt of the appeal. 26 The director shall include in the response a description of 27 each interview carried out by the department relating to the 28 disciplinary action, the results of such interviews, and 29 the justification for the directorâs decision regarding the 30 disciplinary action. 31